Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 24
DAIRY PRODUCTS

35-24-101 to 35-24-208. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article repealed, p. 902, § 4, effective April 5.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 6 of chapter 7, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1985, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning dairy products and imitation dairy products, see parts 1 and 2 of article 5.5 of title 25.